Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.325.010

Fees for optional noncredit extracurricular events—Disposition.

The board of directors of any common school district may establish and collect a fee from students and nonstudents as a condition to their attendance at, or participation in, any optional noncredit extracurricular event of the district which is of a cultural, social, recreational, or athletic nature: PROVIDED, That in establishing such fee or fees, the district shall adopt a policy and regulations for waiving fees for students who are eligible to participate in the federal free or reduced-price meals program and for reducing fees for students' family members and other nonstudents of the age of sixty-five or over who, by reason of their low income, would have difficulty in paying the entire amount of such fees. An optional comprehensive fee may be established and collected for any combination or all of such events or, in the alternative, a fee may be established and collected as a condition to attendance at any single event. Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the associated student body program fund of the school district, and may be expended to defray the costs of optional noncredit extracurricular events of such a cultural, social, recreational, or athletic nature, or to otherwise support the activities and programs of associated student bodies.

[ 2020 c 13 s 9; 1977 ex.s. c 170 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 284 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.113.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2020 c 13: See note following RCW 28A.320.580.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 284: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of its provisions to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 284 s 4.]